District of Columbia statutes.
2-355.03

Use of other types of contracts.

Subject to the limitations of this chapter and this subchapter, any type of contract which will promote the best interests of the District may be used.

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 503, 58 DCR 1185